Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
There are appropriated  to the Department of Justice, for the biennium be-
ginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the following amounts, for the following pur-
poses:
(1) Office of the Attorney
General and Administration ..... $ 853,728
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 446,470
(3) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 23,206,720
(4) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division....................... $ 25,019,494
(5) Defense of Criminal
Convictions................................ $ 43,846,734
(6) Division of Child Support.......... $ 55,821,942
(7) Debt service and related
costs .......................................... $ 908,250
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or received by the Department of Justice,
for the following purposes:
(1) Office of the Attorney
General and Administration ..... $ 54,371,524
(2) Appellate Division ..................... $ 30,223,753
(3) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 64,182,933
(4) Child Advocacy Division............ $ 74,262,696
(5) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 8,574,606
(6) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division....................... $ 29,619,429
(7) General Counsel Division .......... $ 88,967,293
(8) Trial Division ............................ $ 58,399,986
(9) Division of Child Support.......... $ 23,951,546
Enrolled Senate Bill 5514 (SB 5514-A) Page 1
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for  payment
of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Department of Justice for  the
following purposes:
(1) Civil Enforcement Division ....... $ 5,913,635
(2) Criminal Justice Division.......... $ 1,517,977
(3) Crime Victim and Survivor
Services Division....................... $ 60,921,371
(4) Division of Child Support.......... $147,583,965
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$15,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Department  of Justice, from American Rescue Plan Act
Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund moneys received  by the Oregon Department of Ad-
ministrative Services and transferred to the Department of Justice, for crime victim and
survivor services, for community violence prevention grants.
SECTION 5.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5514 (SB 5514-A) Page 2